Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1416
Genetic tests; chain of custody; competent evidence.

The chain of custody of blood or tissue specimens shall be competent evidence and admissible by stipulation or by a verified written report, without the need for foundation testimony or other proof of authenticity, unless a timely written request for testimony is made at least thirty days prior to trial.

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 63.